Louisiana, session 2026, HB654.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2116.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2116.3. Nursing facilities; facility need review; applications for licensure;
exceptions
A.(1) The Louisiana Department of Health, in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act, shall establish a facility need review process for
nursing facilities consistent with the regulations for licensure and for Title XIX of
the Social Security Act.
(2) Beginning on August 1, 2026, and every three years thereafter, the
department shall conduct a review of each parish to determine the availability of
nursing facility beds in the parish. The department shall collect all of the following:
(a) The number of persons age sixty-five years or older in the United States
as estimated by the United States Census Bureau.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-196 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 654
(b) The number of nursing facility beds licensed in the United States as
determined by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
(c) The number of persons age sixty-five or older in a parish as estimated by
the United States Census Bureau.
(3) The department shall divide the number of persons age sixty five or older
in the United States by the number of nursing facility beds licensed in the United
States and then divide the number of persons age sixty-five or older in the parish by
the quotient to determine the number of nursing facility beds needed in the parish.
(4) If a parish needs between thirty and one hundred twenty nursing facility
beds, the department shall accept applications to expand existing high-quality
nursing facilities licensed to operate in the parish where need is determined. The
department shall consider a nursing facility high-quality if the staffing and quality
measure subcomponents of the five-star quality rating system established by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services are greater than three stars.
(5) If a parish needs more than one hundred twenty nursing facility beds, the
department shall accept applications to grant a license to operate a new nursing
facility consisting of one hundred twenty nursing facility beds in the parish where
need is determined.
(6) Following any analysis in accordance with this Subsection, the
department shall make public notice of new licensed nursing facility bed availability
within thirty days of completion. A prospective applicant shall have thirty days from
the date of notice to file an application for consideration to obtain new licenses.
(7) No new facility, service, or bed shall be licensed and certified to
participate in the Title XIX program without the approval of the department based
upon a determination of a need for nursing facility beds in accordance with the
provisions of this Section. Any person establishing, managing, or operating a new
facility, service, or bed without the approval required by this Section shall be
prohibited from participating in the Title XIX program.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-196 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 654
B.(1) The department shall establish evaluation metrics to rank applications
which shall include but not be limited to all of the following:
(a) The type of resident accommodations.
(b) The quality of nursing facilities owned and operated by the applicant.
(c) The level of experience of the owner or operator in building or renovating
nursing facilities in this state.
(2) An applicant shall be defined as any individual, limited liability
company, or corporation owning five percent or more in one or more Louisiana
nursing homes. An applicant's Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services star
rating shall include its cumulative statewide average of all facilities owned, operated,
and managed.
(3) For new facilities, the department shall give preference to applicants who
commit to building and operating nursing facilities with a minimum ninety-five
percent private rooms and private restrooms with a total facility minimum of five
hundred fifty square feet per bed and who maintain facilities with a statewide
average three star or above on the staffing and quality measure subcomponents of the
five-star quality rating system created by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services.
(4) The department shall only consider applications for new nursing facilities
from entities that are both owner and operator.
(5) The department shall utilize the facility need review committee provided
for in R.S. 40:2116 to evaluate applications in accordance with this Subsection.
(6) If the department grants a license to expand an existing nursing facility
or open a new nursing facility, the licensee has one year to secure building permits
and begin construction. If the licensee fails to achieve this requirement, the license
issued shall be returned to the department and issued to the next most eligible
applicant.
C. The facility need review determination provided for in Subsection A of
this Section does not apply to the following:
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-196 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 654
(1) Replacement of existing facilities, if there is no increase in existing
nursing home beds at the replacement facility. However, a nursing home that has
relocated as the result of an executive order or declaration of emergency or disaster
issued in accordance with R.S. 29:724 shall not be allowed to permanently relocate
such facility outside of the geographic area for which the original facility was
licensed.
(2) Replacement of nursing facility beds with adult residential care home
beds, either through new construction or through renovation and conversion. Such
replacement is subject to licensing rules and regulations and budget neutrality
provisions promulgated by the Louisiana Department of Health.
(3) Nursing home beds in alternate use.
Section 2. R.S. 40:2116.1 is hereby repealed in its entirety.